Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,108
Consumer credit transaction; voluntary surrender of goods; creditor's right to enforce security interest.

Sections 45-1,105 to 45-1,107 shall not prohibit a consumer from voluntarily surrendering possession of goods which are collateral and shall not prohibit the creditor from thereafter enforcing any security interest in the goods at any time after default.

Laws 1983, LB 111, § 4.